Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.070

Expanded function dental auxiliary—Scope of practice.

(1) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the scope of expanded function dental auxiliary services related to patient care and laboratory duties that may be performed by expanded function dental auxiliaries.

(2) The scope of expanded function dental auxiliary services that the commission identifies in subsection (1) of this section includes:

(a) In addition to the dental assisting services that a dental assistant may perform under the close supervision of a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist, the performance of the following services under the general supervision of a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist as the dentist or dental therapist may allow:

(i) Performing coronal polishing;

(ii) Giving fluoride treatments;

(iii) Applying sealants;

(iv) Placing dental x-ray film and exposing and developing the films;

(v) Giving patient oral health instruction; and

(b) Notwithstanding any prohibitions in RCW 18.260.040, the performance of the following services under the close supervision of a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist as the dentist or dental therapist may allow:

(i) Placing and carving direct restorations; and

(ii) Taking final impressions.

(3) A dentist or dental therapist may not assign an expanded function dental auxiliary to perform services until the expanded function dental auxiliary has demonstrated skills necessary to perform competently all assigned duties and responsibilities.

[ 2023 c 460 s 18; 2007 c 269 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.